dict/pt_BR.aff
FLAG UTF-8
SFX m   ar      á-lo-ia        boiar
SFX m   r       -lo-ia         denegrir
SFX m   ar      á-lo-ia        gar
SFX m   r       -lo-ia         gir
SFX m   ar      á-lo-ia        iuvar
SFX m   ir      í-la-iam       air
SFX m   ir      í-la-iam       [^qg]uir
SFX m   r       -la-iam        [qg]uir
SFX m   ar      á-la-iam       boiar
SFX m   r       -la-iam        denegrir
SFX m   ar      á-la-iam       gar
SFX m   r       -la-iam        gir
SFX m   ar      á-la-iam       iuvar
SFX m   ir      í-lo-iam       [aüu]ir
SFX m   ar      á-lo-iam       boiar
SFX m   r       -lo-iam        denegrir
SFX m   ar      á-lo-iam       gar
SFX m   r       -lo-iam        gir
SFX m   ar      á-lo-iam       iuvar
SFX m   ir      í-las-ia       air
SFX m   ir      í-las-ia       [^qg]uir
SFX m   r       -las-ia        [qg]uir
SFX m   ar      á-las-ia       boiar
SFX m   r       -las-ia        denegrir
SFX m   ar      á-las-ia       gar
SFX m   r       -las-ia        gir
SFX m   ar      á-las-ia       iuvar
SFX m   ir      í-los-ia       air
SFX m   ir      í-los-ia       [^qg]uir
SFX m   r       -los-ia        [qg]uir
SFX m   ar      á-los-ia       boiar
SFX m   r       -los-ia        denegrir
SFX m   ar      á-los-ia       gar
SFX m   r       -los-ia        gir
SFX m   ar      á-los-ia       iuvar
SFX m   ir      í-las-iam      air
SFX m   ir      í-las-iam      [^qg]uir
SFX m   r       -las-iam       [qg]uir
SFX m   ar      á-las-iam      boiar
SFX m   r       -las-iam       denegrir
SFX m   ar      á-las-iam      gar
SFX m   r       -las-iam       gir
SFX m   ar      á-las-iam      iuvar
SFX m   ir      í-los-iam      air
SFX m   ir      í-los-iam      [^qg]uir
SFX m   r       -los-iam       [qg]uir
SFX m   ar      á-los-iam      boiar
SFX m   r       -los-iam       denegrir
SFX m   ar      á-los-iam      gar
SFX m   r       -los-iam       gir
SFX m   ar      á-los-iam      iuvar
SFX m   ir      í-lo-á         air
SFX m   ir      í-lo-á         [^qg]uir
SFX m   r       -lo-á          [qg]uir
SFX m   r       -lo-á          boiar
SFX m   r       -lo-á          denegrir
SFX m   ar      á-lo-á         gar
SFX m   r       -lo-á          gir
SFX m   r       á-lo-á         iuvar
SFX m   er      ê-lo-á         oer
SFX m   r       -lo-á          oibir
SFX m   er      ê-lo-á         prazer
SFX m   r       -lo-á          subir
SFX m   er      ê-lo-á         valer
SFX m   r       -lo-á          vestir
SFX m   r       -lo-á          vir
SFX m   ir      í-lo-emos      air
SFX m   ir      í-lo-emos      [^qg]uir
SFX m   r       -lo-emos       [qg]uir
SFX m   ar      á-lo-emos      boiar
SFX m   r       -lo-emos       denegrir
SFX m   ar      á-lo-emos      gar
SFX m   r       -lo-emos       gir
SFX m   r       -lo-emos       iuvar
SFX m   er      ê-lo-emos      oer
SFX m   r       -lo-emos       oibir
SFX m   er      ê-lo-emos      prazer
SFX m   r       -lo-emos       subir
SFX m   er      ê-lo-emos      ter
SFX m   er      ê-lo-emos      valer
SFX m   r       -lo-emos       vestir
SFX m   r       -lo-emos       vir
SFX m   ir      í-los-á        air
SFX m   ir      í-los-á        [^qg]uir
SFX m   r       -los-á         [qg]uir
SFX m   ar      á-los-á        boiar
SFX m   r       -los-á         denegrir
SFX m   ar      á-los-á        gar
SFX m   r       -los-á         gir
SFX m   ar      á-los-á        iuvar
SFX m   er      ê-los-á        oer
SFX m   r       -los-á         oibir
SFX m   er      ê-los-á        prazer
SFX m   r       -los-á         subir
SFX m   er      ê-los-á        valer
SFX m   r       -los-á         vestir
SFX m   r       -los-á         vir
SFX m   ir      í-los-emos     air
SFX m   ir      í-los-emos     [^qg]uir
SFX m   r       -los-emos      [qg]uir
SFX m   ar      á-los-emos     boiar
SFX m   r       -los-emos      denegrir
SFX m   ar      á-los-emos     gar
SFX m   r       -los-emos      gir
SFX m   ar      á-los-emos     iuvar
SFX m   er      ê-los-emos     oer
SFX m   r       -los-emos      oibir
SFX m   er      ê-los-emos     prazer
SFX m   r       -los-emos      subir
SFX m   er      ê-los-emos     ter
SFX m   er      ê-los-emos     valer
SFX m   r       -los-emos      vestir
SFX m   r       -los-emos      vir
SFX m   0       -me            [aei]r
SFX m   0       -me-á          [aüu]ir
SFX m   0       -me-á          boiar
SFX m   0       -me-á          denegrir
SFX m   0       -me-á          gar
SFX m   0       -me-á          gir
SFX m   0       -me-á          iuvar
SFX m   0       -me-á          oer
SFX m   0       -me-á          oibir
SFX m   0       -me-á          prazer
SFX m   0       -me-á          subir
SFX m   0       -me-á          valer
SFX m   0       -me-á          vestir
SFX m   0       -me-á          vir
SFX m   0       -me-ão         [aüu]ir
SFX m   0       -me-ão         boiar
SFX m   0       -me-ão         denegrir
SFX m   0       -me-ão         gar
SFX m   0       -me-ão         gir
SFX m   0       -me-ão         iuvar
SFX m   0       -me-ão         oer
SFX m   0       -me-ão         oibir
SFX m   0       -me-ão         prazer
SFX m   0       -me-ão         subir
SFX m   0       -me-ão         valer
SFX m   0       -me-ão         vestir
SFX m   0       -me-ão         vir
SFX m   0       -me-ás         subir
SFX m   0       -me-ás         ter
SFX m   0       -me-ás         valer
SFX m   0       -me-ás         vestir
SFX m   0       -me-ás         vir
SFX m   0       -me-ei         [aüu]ir
SFX m   0       -me-ei         boiar
SFX m   0       -me-ei         denegrir
SFX m   0       -me-ei         gar
SFX m   0       -me-ei         gir
SFX m   0       -me-ei         iuvar
SFX m   0       -me-ei         oer
SFX m   0       -me-ei         oibir
SFX m   0       -me-ei         prazer
SFX m   0       -me-ei         subir
SFX m   0       -me-ei         valer
SFX m   0       -me-ei         vestir
SFX m   0       -me-ei         vir
SFX m   0       -me-ia         [aüu]ir
SFX m   0       -me-ia         boiar
SFX m   0       -me-ia         denegrir
SFX m   0       -me-ia         gar
SFX m   0       -me-ia         gir
SFX m   0       -me-ia         iuvar
SFX m   0       -me-ia         oer
SFX m   0       -me-ia         oibir
SFX m   0       -me-ia         prazer
SFX m   0       -me-ia         subir
SFX m   0       -me-ia         valer
SFX m   0       -me-ia         vestir
SFX m   0       -me-ia         vir
SFX m   0       -me-iam        [aüu]ir
SFX m   0       -me-iam        boiar
SFX m   0       -me-iam        denegrir
SFX m   0       -me-iam        gar
SFX m   0       -me-iam        gir
SFX m   0       -me-iam        iuvar
SFX m   0       -me-iam        oer
SFX m   0       -me-iam        oibir
SFX m   0       -me-iam        prazer
SFX m   0       -me-iam        subir
SFX m   0       -me-iam        valer
SFX m   0       -me-iam        vestir
SFX m   0       -me-iam        vir
SFX m   0       -nos           [aei]r
SFX m   0       -nos-á         [aüu]ir
SFX m   0       -nos-á         boiar
SFX m   0       -nos-á         denegrir
SFX m   0       -nos-á         gar
SFX m   0       -nos-á         gir
SFX m   0       -nos-á         iuvar
SFX m   0       -nos-á         oer
SFX m   0       -nos-á         oibir
SFX m   0       -nos-á         prazer
SFX m   0       -nos-á         subir
SFX m   0       -nos-á         valer
SFX m   0       -nos-á         vestir
SFX m   0       -nos-á         vir
SFX m   0       -nos-ão        [aüu]ir
SFX m   0       -nos-ão        boiar
SFX m   0       -nos-ão        denegrir
SFX m   0       -nos-ão        gar
SFX m   0       -nos-ão        gir
SFX m   0       -nos-ão        iuvar
SFX m   0       -nos-ão        oer
SFX m   0       -nos-ão        oibir
SFX m   0       -nos-ão        prazer
SFX m   0       -nos-ão        subir
SFX m   0       -nos-ão        ter
SFX m   0       -nos-ão        valer
SFX m   0       -nos-ão        vestir
SFX m   0       -nos-ão        vir
SFX m   0       -nos-ás        subir
SFX m   0       -nos-ás        ter
SFX m   0       -nos-ás        valer
SFX m   0       -nos-ás        vestir
