dict/pt_BR.dic
abelgar/cjLmMY
abjugar/cjLmMY
abjurgar/cjLmY
abluir/cjLm
abnuir/cjLm
abougar/cjLmMY
abster/bcjMm
achegar/cjLmMYÂ
aconchegar/cjLmMYÂ
adargar/cjLmMY
adelgar/cjLmMY
adergar/cjLmMY
adligar/cjLmY
adstringir/cjLMm
advogar/cjLmMYÂ
afidalgar/cjLmMY
aflamengar/cjLmMY
afogar/cjLmMYÂ
agar/cjLMm
agregar/cjLMmYÂÑÜ
ajindungar/cjLmMY
alagar/cjLmMYÂ
albergar/cjLmMY
aletargar/cjLmMY
alguergar/cjLmMY
almondegar/cjLmMY
alugar/cjLMmYÀÂÈË
alvergar/cjLmMY
amanteigar/cjLmMY
amigar/cjLmYÂ
amolgar/cjLmYÂ
amulherengar/cjLmMY
anuir/cjLm
apegar/cjLmMYÂ
ardigar/cjLmMY
armengar/cjLmMY
arrair/cjLMm
arremangar/cjLmMY
arrengar/cjLmMY
arrogar/cjLmMY
assossegar/cjLmMYÂ
ater/cjLMm
atuir/cjLm
augar/cjLmMYÂ
autorrevogar/cjLmY
avargar/cjLmMY
averdungar/cjLmMY
azougar/cjLmMY
bajogar/cjLmY
barregar/cjLmMYò
bexigar/cjLmMYò
bisnagar/cjLmMY
bogar/cjLmY
bongar/cjLmMY
brigar/cjLmMY
bungar/cjLmMY
buzegar/cjLmMY
cafungar/cjLmMY
cair/cjLMmÀÂò
candongar/cjLmMY
capangar/cjLmMYò
capiangar/cjLmMY
cargar/cjLmMYÀÂ
castigar/cjLmMY
catingar/cjLmMY
cavalgar/cjLmMYÀÂ
cegar/cjLmYÂÑ
cergir/cjLMm
chambregar/cjLmMY
changar/cjLmMY
charingar/cjLmMY
chiangar/cjLmMY
choramingar/cjLmMY
cingir/cjLMmÀÂÄìò
circunavegar/cjLmY
circunvagar/cjLmMY
circunvoluir/cjLm
coibir/cjLm
coligar/cjLmMYÀ
comboiar/cjLmMY
compungir/cjLMm
comungar/cjLmMYÂ
concluir/cjLm
confluir/cjLm
conjugar/cjLmYÂÎ
conseguir/cjLmÂ
constringir/cjLMm
contrair/cjLmÂ
contravir/cjLMm
convir/cjLmMÀÂ
corroer/cjLMm
debagar/cjLmMY
decair/cjLMm
defluir/cjLm
delegar/cjLmYÈ
delingar/cjLmMY
demovir/cjLMm
denegrir/cjLMm
derraigar/cjLmMY
derreigar/cjLmMY
derrogar/cjmNY
dervirgar/cjLmMY
desbarrigar/cjLmMY
descomovir/cjLMm
desgregar/cjLmY
desnarigar/cjLmMY
despostigar/cjLmMY
desrevestir/cjLMm
destituir/cjLm
desvirgar/cjLmMY
deter/bcjMmÑ
detrair/cjLMm
devulgar/cjLmMY
difluir/cjLm
diluir/cjLm
dirigir/cjLmÃÈÑ
disgregar/cjLmY
distinguir/cjLmÈÓ
distribuir/cjLmÀ
divagar/cjLmY
djumbair/cjLMm
domingar/cjLmYò
drogar/cjLmMY
eligir/cjLMm
embagar/cjLmMY
embelgar/cjLmY
embizugar/cjLmMY
embougar/cjLmMY
empangar/cjLmMY
empocilgar/cjLmMY
empulgar/cjLmMY
encarangar/cjLmYÂ
encorrugir/cjLMm
enesgar/cjLmMY
engalgar/cjLmMY
enjalgar/cjLmMY
enlagar/cjLmMY
enrugar/cjLmMYÂ
entaleigar/cjLmMY
entapigar/cjLmMY
entrerregar/cjLmMY
envesgar/cjLmMY
enxaugar/cjLmMY
epilogar/cjLmY
esbangar/cjLmMY
esborregar/cjLmMY
escamurrengar/cjLmMY
esfandegar/cjLmMY
esfornigar/cjLmMY
esgargar/cjLmMY
esmagar/cjLmMY
espadagar/cjLmMY
espargir/cjLMm
espernegar/cjLmMY
espulgar/cjLmY
estingar/cjLmMY
estordegar/cjLmMY
estragar/cjLmY
estrigar/cjLmMY
estrugir/cjLMm
everter/bcjMm
exgregar/cjLmMY
expungir/cjLMm
extinguir/cjLmÃ
fandangar/cjLmMYò
figar/2cjLMmYZ
folegar/cjLmMYÀÂ
fornigar/cjLmMY
fregar/cjLmYÀ
fugar/cjLmMYÀ
fungar/cjLmMYÀ
galgar/cjLmYÂÌò
girovagar/cjLmMY
gruir/cjLm
homologar/cjmNY
imiscuir/cjLm
indilgar/cjLmMY
instigar/cjLmY
inteigar/cjLmMY
intuir/cjLm
invulgar/cjJLmMY
jogar/cjLmY
jumbair/cjLMm
lambregar/cjLmMY
later/cjLMm
leigar/cjLmMYÂ
ligar/cjLmMYÀÂÃÄÈòú
lobrigar/cjLmMY
madrugar/cjLmMY
manter/bcjmMÀÂ
meigar/cjLmMYò
mergar/cjLmMY
mitigar/cjLmMY
molgar/cjLmMYÀ
morangar/cjLmMY
mossegar/cjLmMYò
mungangar/cjLmMY
naufragar/cjLmMYò
noctivagar/cjLmMY
obstringir/cjLMm
ocluir/cjLm
ortigar/cjLmMY
pandegar/cjLmMY
pechiringar/cjLmMY
perdigar/cjLmMY
perrengar/cjLmMY
pesgar/cjLmMY
pindongar/cjLmMY
pisgar/cjLmMY
poluir/cjLmÂ
postergar/cjLmY
pregar/cjLmYÀÂ
prodigar/cjLmY
prolongar/cjLmMY
prorrogar/cjLmY
pruir/cjLmÀ
purgar/cjLmYÀ
ramangar/cjLmMY
rasgar/cjLmMY
redengar/cjLmMY
refogar/cjLmMY
reiperseguir/cm
repilgar/cjLmMY
resgar/cjLmMY
resmusgar/cjLmMY
restinguir/cjLm
restrugir/cjLMm
retrocarregar/cjLmY
ringir/cjLMm
roer/cjLMm
ruir/cjLmó
salgar/cjLmMYÀÂ
segar/cjLmMYÀ
sengar/cjLmMY
sobnegar/cjLmMY
soer/cjLMm
sojugar/cjLmMY
sossegar/cjLmMYÂ
substituir/cjLm
sujigar/cjLmMY
suster/cjLMm
tasgar/cjLmMY
tetrassubstituir/cm
togar/cjLmMY
tostegar/cjLmMY
transfegar/cjLmMY
trefegar/cjLmMY
tresfolgar/cjLmMY
tugir/cjLMm
ugar/cjLmMYÂ
usufruir/cjLm
variegar/cjLmY
vermifugar/cjLmY
vingar/cjLmMYÀò
vungar/cjLmMY
zangar/cjLmMYò
zuir/cjLm
